North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 9. Department of Insurance.

§ 143A-73.
Creation.

There is hereby created a Department of Insurance. The head of the Department of Insurance is the Commissioner of Insurance.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 11.

§ 143A-74.
Commissioner of Insurance; powers and duties.

The Commissioner of Insurance shall have such powers and duties as are conferred on him by this Chapter, delegated to him by the Governor, and conferred by the Constitution and laws of this State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 11.

§ 143A-75.
Commissioner of Insurance; transfer of powers and duties to Department.

Except as otherwise provided in the Constitution or in this Chapter, all powers, duties and functions vested in the Commissioner of Insurance are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Insurance.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 11.

§ 143A-76.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 666, s. 11.

§ 143A-77.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 666, s. 12.

§ 143A-78.
Building Code Council; transfer.

The Building Code Council, as contained in Article 9 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of Insurance.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 11.

§ 143A-79.
State Volunteer Fire Department; transfer.

The State Volunteer Fire Department, as contained in Article 3 of Chapter 69 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of Insurance.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 11.

§ 143A-79.1.
Public Officers and Employees Liability Insurance Commission; transfer.

The Public Officers and Employees Liability Insurance Commission, as contained in Part 20 of Article 9 of General Statutes Chapter 143B, is transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of Insurance.

History.

1985, c. 666, s. 78.

§ 143A-79.2.
State Fire Commission; transfer.

The State Fire Commission, described in Part 4 of Article 11 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes, is transferred from the Department of Crime Control and Public Safety to the Department of Insurance. This transfer shall include all elements of a Type I transfer as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 167(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(g); 2012-194, s. 39.

§ 143A-79.3.
North Carolina Industrial Commission; transfer.

The statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds of the Industrial Commission are transferred to the Department of Insurance with all of the elements of a Type II transfer as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the statutory duties or the independent operation of the Industrial Commission.

History.

2017-57, s. 15.19A(a).